Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.005

Definitions. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" and "children," when used with reference to a decedent, means all persons who have a parent-child relationship, as defined in RCW 26.26A.100, as a child with the decedent, regardless of a person's age.

(2) "Claimant" means a person entitled to petition for an award under this chapter. If multiple parties are entitled to petition for an award, all of them are a "claimant."

(3) "Dependent," when used with reference to a decedent's child, means a person who received more than half of that person's support from the decedent during the 12 months preceding the decedent's death. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "support" does not include any public or governmental support.

(4) "Value," when used with reference to any property that may be exempt from the claims of creditors under this chapter or under the laws of another state and that is being purchased on contract or is subject to any encumbrance, means the value of the property net of the balance due on the contract and the amount of the encumbrance. Any property exempted from creditor's claims under RCW 11.54.008 or awarded under RCW 11.54.010 will continue to be subject to any such contract or encumbrance.

[ 2024 c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.